California statutes. Water Code
A district may in lieu either in whole or in part of levying the annual assessments for district purposes use any revenue derived prior to or during the next enusing calendar year from charges which the district may fix and collect pursuant to Section 22280.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 372.)
-------------------------------------------

25656.

At the time of levying the annual assessment, there shall be added by the board to the annual assessment on land within any improvement district or distribution district within any district:

(a) The installment, if any, for which the land is liable in that year by reason of an improvement district or distribution district assessment levied pursuant to Chapter 1 or 2 of Part 7 or Part 6.5 of this division.

(b) An amount which the board may consider necessary for the operation of the works in or for the improvement district or distribution
 district for the ensuing year.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1951, Ch. 1053.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Completion Assessments [25670. - 25679.]

25670.

A district shall by levy of a completion assessment provide for the completion of a plan of works adopted and the acquisition of necessary property, water, and water rights therefor when either:

(a) The money raised by the sale of authorized bonds is insufficient and additional bonds are not voted for these purposes.

(b) Bonds voted are unavailable for these purposes and additional bonds are not voted therefor.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 372.)
-------------------------------------------

25671.

A completion assessment shall not be levied until both:

(a) An estimate of the amount required to complete the plan has been made by the board.

(b) A proposal for making the levy has been approved by the voters.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 372.)
-------------------------------------------

25672.

Before a completion assessment proposal is submitted to the voters, an order of submission shall be entered in the minutes of the board, stating:

(a) The amount to be levied.

(b) The purpose of the levy.

(c) The day of the election.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 372.)
-------------------------------------------

25673.

Notice of the election shall be given by both:

(a) Posting notices in three public places in each election precinct in the district for at least 20 days.

(b) Publication in a newspaper published in the office county, once a week for at least three successive weeks.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 372.)
-------------------------------------------

25674.

The notice of the election shall specify both:

(a) The day, hours, and polling places in each precinct for holding the election.

(b) The amount of assessment proposed to be levied.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 372.)
-------------------------------------------

25675.

To the right of or below each question on the ballot, the words “Yes” and “No” shall be printed on separate lines, with voting targets.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 2025, Ch. 303, Sec. 48.   (AB 1512)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

25676.

The election shall be held and the result determined and declared as nearly as practicable in conformity with the provisions governing general district elections.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1965, Ch. 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

25677.

If a majority of the votes cast at the election are “Assessment—Yes,” the district by its board shall levy an assessment in the amount stated in the order of submission.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 372.)
-------------------------------------------

25678.

If a majority of the votes cast are “Assessment—No,” the result of the election shall be entered of record.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 372.)
-------------------------------------------

25679.

No informalities in the conduct of the election shall invalidate the election if fairly conducted.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 372.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3. Particular Purpose Assessments [25700. - 25705.]

25700.

The amount of an assessment levied under this article is not limited by any other provision of this part. The levy of an assessment under this article does not limit the amount of any other assessment levied under this part.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 372.)
-------------------------------------------

25701.

The board may at any time call an election to submit to the voters a proposal to levy a particular purpose assessment to be applied to any of the purposes of the district.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 372.)
-------------------------------------------

25702.

The notice of the election shall set forth the following:

(a) The day, hours, and polling places in each precinct for holding the election.

(b) The amount of money proposed to be raised by the assessment.

(c) A general statement of the purposes for which it is intended to be used. 

(d) If the board so determines, a statement both that the assessment shall be levied in two or three annual installments and the amount of
 the installment to be levied each year.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 372.)
-------------------------------------------

25703.

To the right of or below each question on the ballot, the words “Yes” and “No” shall be printed on separate lines, with voting targets.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 2025, Ch. 303, Sec. 50.   (AB 1512)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

25704.

The election shall be held and the result determined and declared as nearly as practicable in conformity with the provisions governing bond elections.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 372.)
-------------------------------------------

25705.

If a majority of the votes cast at the election are “Assessment—Yes,” the district by its board shall at the time of the levy of the annual assessments levy a sum sufficient to raise the amount voted or if the notice of election provides for annual installments, then a sum sufficient to raise the amount of the installment provided in the notice to be raised in the particular year.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 372.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 4. Emergency Assessments [25725. - 25725.]

25725.

In cases of emergency by which the flow of water in a canal or other supply is interrupted, the amount of the cost of the repairs not to exceed in any one year forty thousand dollars ($40,000) may, in addition to any other assessments, be levied by the adoption of a resolution by at least four-fifths of the members of the board at the time of the levying of the annual assessment, without the submission of a proposal for the levy to the voters.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 372.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 3. Assessment Rate [25800. - 25835.]



  ARTICLE 1. Regular Rate [25800. - 25809.]

25800.

The secretary annually prior to delivering the assessment book to the collector shall compute and enter in a separate column of the assessment book the respective sums in dollars and cents to be paid as an annual district assessment on the land listed.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 372.)
-------------------------------------------

25800.2.

In the event the annual assessment for any parcel of land separately assessed, computed pursuant to Sections 25800 and 25801, is less than ten dollars ($10), a minimum annual assessment may be set by the board which shall not exceed ten dollars ($10) for each such separately assessed parcel of land, and upon a determination by the board that a minimum assessment shall be set, the secretary shall enter that assessment for each separately assessed parcel of land for which the annual assessment is less than the amount set by the board.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1979, Ch. 312.)
-------------------------------------------

25801.

The annual rate of assessments shall be equal to the sum to be raised for district purposes divided by 85 per cent of the aggregate equalized assessed value of the land as it appears on the assessment book for the assessment year, the 15 per cent being deducted for anticipated delinquencies.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 372.)
-------------------------------------------

25802.

If any land is subject to a special rate of assessment for district purposes, the rates of assessment shall be adjusted to produce the sum to be raised computed upon the 85 per cent of the aggregate equalized assessed value.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 372.)
-------------------------------------------

25803.

Limited assessments shall be computed and entered by the secretary and collected as a part of the annual assessment.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 372.)
-------------------------------------------

25803.5.

Annual ad valorem assessments of a distribution district shall be entered in the assessment book by the secretary.

(History: Added by Stats. 1949, Ch. 169.)
-------------------------------------------

25804.

Annual installments of an improvement district assessment shall be entered in the assessment book by the secretary.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 372.)
-------------------------------------------

25805.

Operation assessments for an improvement district shall be computed upon the same valuation on land within the improvement district and entered in the same manner as the district annual assessment.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 372.)
-------------------------------------------

25806.

(a) In case any charges for water and other services or either remain unpaid, the amount of the unpaid charges may, in the discretion of the district:

(1) If unpaid at the time specified for delivery of the assessment book to the collector, be added to and become a part of the annual assessment levied upon the real property upon which the water for which the charges are unpaid was used and upon the real property subject to the charges for any other district services and shall constitute a lien on that real property. However, if, during the year preceding the date on which the first
 installment of real property taxes which evidence the charges appears on the roll, any real property to which the lien would attach has been transferred or conveyed to a bona fide purchaser for value, or if a lien of a bona fide encumbrancer for value has been created and attaches thereon, then the lien which would otherwise be imposed by this subdivision shall not be added to and become part of the annual assessment nor shall it attach to the real property.

(2) Be secured at any time by filing for record in the office of the county recorder of any county, a certificate specifying the amount of the charges and the name and address of the person liable therefor.

From the time of recordation of the certificate, the amount required to be paid together with interest and penalty constitutes a lien upon all real property in the county owned by the person or afterwards, and before the lien expires, acquired
 by him or her. The lien has the force, priority, and effect of a judgment lien and shall continue for 10 years from the date of the filing of the certificate unless sooner released or otherwise discharged. The lien may, within 10 years from the filing of the certificate or within 10 years from the date of the last extension of the lien in the manner herein provided, be extended by filing for record a new certificate in the office of the county recorder of any county and from the time of the filing the lien shall be extended to the real property in such county for 10 years unless sooner released or otherwise discharged.

When the charges have become delinquent, they may be collected in the manner provided for the collection of delinquent assessments in Chapter 5 (commencing with Section 26075) and Chapter 6 (commencing with Section 26225) of Division 11 of Part 10.

(b) Where the county assumes the
 responsibility of assessment and collection pursuant to Chapter 7 (commencing with Section 26500), the amount of the unpaid charges may be added to, and become part of, the annual assessment levied upon the real property upon which the water for which the charges are unpaid was used and upon the real property subject to the charges for any other district services and shall constitute a lien on that real property upon recordation of the order confirming the assessment in the office of the county recorder of the county in which the real property is situated. However, if, during the year preceding the date on which the first installment of real property taxes which evidence the charges appears on the roll, any real property to which the lien would attach has been transferred or conveyed to a bona fide purchaser for value, or if a lien of a bona fide encumbrancer for value has been created and attaches thereon, then the lien which would otherwise be imposed by this subdivision shall not attach to the real
 property and the costs of the water and services or either, as confirmed, relating to the property shall be transferred to the unsecured roll for collection.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1987, Ch. 1052, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

25807.

If the annual district assessment is payable in two installments the unpaid charges may be added to and become a part of the first installment.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 372.)
-------------------------------------------

25808.

On or before the first day of November the secretary shall deliver the assessment book to the collector.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 372.)
-------------------------------------------

25809.

A district may make an additional reasonable charge for processing or reprocessing an invalid check or other instrument used to pay an assessment or service charge owed to the district. The reasonable charge shall be for cost of the processing or reprocessing of the invalid check or instrument. If the charge for processing becomes delinquent, the charge may become a lien against the land on which the assessment was made or to which the service was rendered, as provided in Section 25806.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1981, Ch. 714, Sec. 457.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Special Rate [25825. - 25835.]

25825.

Any person having an interest in any land within the district may file with the secretary a verified petition alleging all of the following:

(a) His land or a described portion of it was when it became a part of the district irrigated from another system of works than the works of or proposed for the district.

(b) It has continued ever since to be exclusively so irrigated.

(c) It is entitled to a special rate of assessment.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 372.)
-------------------------------------------

25825.1.

Within the Madera Irrigation District only, any person having an interest in any land within the district may file with the secretary, in lieu of the petition authorized by Section 25825, a verified petition alleging as to such land all of the following:

(a) It is served by a municipal water supply.

(b) It is entitled to a special rate of assessment.

The procedure for any such petition shall be in accordance with this article. 

A city whose area or any portion
 thereof is located within the boundaries of the Madera Irrigation District may petition the district to establish a special rate for the land in such city area on the basis that such area is served by a municipal water supply and is not susceptible of irrigation and therefore not benefited in a sufficient manner to justify assessment at the regular rate. The procedure for any such petition shall be in accordance with this article.

After the conclusion of the hearing as provided in Section 25831, if the board finds that any of the land described in any petition is served by a municipal water supply and is not and will not be benefited to the same extent as other lands by the operations of the district or in a manner that would justify its assessment at the regular rate of assessment, the board may adjust the rate of assessment on the land in an order entered in full upon its minutes.

(History: Added by Stats. 1974, Ch. 422.)
-------------------------------------------

25825.2.

(a) Within the Solano Irrigation District only, any person having an interest in any land within the district may file with the secretary, in lieu of the petition authorized by Section 25825, a verified petition alleging as to such land the following:

(1) His land, or a described portion of it, was, when it became a part of the district, irrigated from another system of works than the works of, or proposed for, the district and it has continued ever since to be so irrigated; or

(2) His land or a described portion of it was
 used on January 1, 1975, for residential purposes and has, after the date upon which it became part of the district as a result of the acts of a governmental entity other than the district, been irrigated or supplied water wholly or partially from a water system owned entirely by such other governmental entity; or

(3) His land or a described portion of it has never received water service from the district of any nature and the board of directors of the district has not at any time prior to filing the petition adopted a plan for future service of water to such lands, which plan may provide for the landowner to pay all costs of providing facilities to transport water from the nearest point at which the district has water available to the lands made subject to the petition; and

(4) It is appropriate to apply a special rate of assessment as provided in subdivision (c).

(b) The procedure for any such petition shall be in accordance with this article. Except that, notwithstanding other provisions of law, the notice required by this article shall be published in at least one newspaper of general circulation printed in every incorporated city with common bounds with the district and the notice shall be posted at the courthouse in Solano County, in each office of the district, and in the city hall of every incorporated city with common bounds with the district. Such publication costs incurred by the district shall be paid by the petitioner in addition to any other fee provided by this article or by law.

(c) After the conclusion of the hearing as provided in Section 25831, if the board finds that any of the land described in any petition has been irrigated, supplied as alleged or no plan for future service has been adopted, and the lands made subject to
 the petition are not and will not be benefited by the operations of the district in a manner that would justify their assessment at the regular rate of assessment, then the board shall determine the average annual dollar value of the benefits to the lands made subject to the petition and shall thence determine the rate necessary to raise such sum through assessments, which shall be at a rate lower than the regular rate of assessment, and the board shall enter in the minutes an order declaring the following:

(1) A finding as to the average annual dollar value of the benefits provided by the district to the lands made subject to the petition; and

(2) The assessed value of the lands made subject to the petition according to the most recent district roll; and

(3) The rate of assessment required to collect such amount
 specified in subdivision (1), including allowance for delinquencies as provided in Section 25801 of the Water Code of the State of California.

(d) Notwithstanding the provisions of Section 25835, the special rate of assessment shall be changed only as necessary to allow for the collection of the average annual dollar value of the benefits provided to the lands made subject to the petition. If, on the petition of owners of the land made subject to a special rate or on the motion of the district itself, it is sought to redetermine the average annual dollar value of the benefits provided by the district, the determination of the board shall not be changed until notice of another hearing shall be advertised and such hearing held as provided in this article. In any action to redetermine the special rate of assessment pursuant to this subdivision initiated by the district, the district shall pay the publication costs as set forth in this
 section.

(History: Added by Stats. 1975, Ch. 710.)
-------------------------------------------

25825.3.

(a) Within the Anderson-Cottonwood Irrigation District only, any person having an interest in any land within the district may file with the secretary, in lieu of the petition authorized by Section 25825, a verified petition alleging it is appropriate to apply a special rate of assessment to that land and, as to that land, one of the following is applicable:

(1) His or her land, or a described portion of it, is used for residential or commercial purposes and has, for five years immediately prior to the date of filing a petition pursuant to this section, been
 irrigated or supplied water, wholly or partially, from a water system not owned or operated by the district.

(2) For five years immediately prior to the date of filing a petition pursuant to this section, his or her land, or a described portion of it, has never received water service from the district of any nature and the board of directors of the district has not, at any time prior to filing the petition, adopted a plan for future service of water to the lands, which plan may provide for the landowner to pay all costs of providing facilities to transport water from the nearest point at which the district has water available to the lands made subject to the petition.

(3) For five years immediately prior to the date of filing a petition pursuant to this section, his or her land, or a described portion of it, was served with water received from wells not owned, maintained, or
 operated by the district and which land and wells are not supplied water of any nature from the district, including, but not limited to, surface, subsurface, or seepage waters, which waters would be suitable for agricultural or domestic purposes.

(b) The procedure for any petition to which this section applies shall be in accordance with this article.

(c) After the conclusion of a hearing as provided in Section 25831, if the board finds that any of the land described in any petition has been supplied as alleged or no plan for future service has been adopted, and the lands made subject to the petition are not and will not be benefited by the operations of the district in a manner that would justify their assessment at the regular rate of assessment, then the board shall adjust the rate of assessment on the land made subject to the petition in an order entered in full upon its
 minutes.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1981, Ch. 714, Sec. 458.)
-------------------------------------------

25826.

The petition shall request that the board determine what proportion of the regular rates of assessment in the district should be used in levying assessments on the land described in the petition.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 372.)
-------------------------------------------

25827.

A fee of ten dollars ($10) shall be paid to the secretary before the filing of each petition for a special rate of assessment. The money shall be applied to the cost of the publication of the notice and other expenses of the hearing. If there is any balance after the conclusion of the hearing, it shall be returned to the petitioner or divided among the petitioners contributing thereto in proportion to the respective areas described in their petitions.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 372.)
-------------------------------------------

25828.

The board shall set a time and place for the hearing of a petition for a special rate of assessment or of all the petitions if more than one has been filed and shall give notice of it in a newspaper published in the office county.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 372.)
-------------------------------------------

25829.

The notice for a special rate of assessment hearing shall state all of the following:

(a) Petitions have been presented to the board praying for a determination that certain land, which need not be described in the notice, is entitled to a special rate of assessment.

(b) The names of the petitioners.

(c) The time and place set for the hearing.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 372.)
-------------------------------------------

25830.

The board shall meet at the time and place set for the hearing and proceed in the order it deems proper to hear the petitions and shall hear all competent and relevant evidence offered in support of any petition or in opposition to it and may adjourn the hearing from time to time.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 372.)
-------------------------------------------

25831.

After the conclusion of the hearing, if the board finds that any of the land described in any petition has been irrigated as alleged and is not and will not be benefited by the operations of the district in a manner that would justify its assessment at the regular rate of assessment, the board shall reduce the rate of assessment on the land in an order entered in full upon its minutes.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 372.)
-------------------------------------------

25832.

The order shall:

(a) Describe the land entitled to a special rate of assessment or the respective parcels of it if separate parcels are to be assessed.

(b) Fix the proportion of the regular rate of assessment which shall be applied in levying assessments on the land described or on each parcel of it if various parcels are found to be entitled to different special rates in order that the assessments to be levied on this land will be proportionate with the benefits which it receives or will receive from the operations of the
 district.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 372.)
-------------------------------------------

25833.

A certified copy of an order determining that any land is entitled to a special rate of assessment shall be delivered to the assessor, and thereafter, until notified of a change in the determination, he shall enter the land described in the order separately in the assessment book and designate it so that it may readily be distinguished from other land not entitled to a special rate.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 372.)
-------------------------------------------

25834.

If a determination that any land is entitled to a special rate of assessment is made in any year too late for the land to be separately described in the assessment book but before the annual assessment has been levied, the board shall direct the secretary to make entries in the assessment book that will enable him to compute the assessments at the special rates determined by the board.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 372.)
-------------------------------------------

25835.

The determination of the board granting or denying a special rate of assessment shall not be changed unless the board on petition of a party affected consents to another hearing or on its own motion causes notice to be served on the owner of the land to show cause why the determination should not be changed, in either of which cases another hearing shall be advertised and held as provided in this article.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 372.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 4. Collection [25925. - 26003.]



  ARTICLE 1. Collection Generally [25925. - 25932.]

25925.

Except as provided in Section 25806, the annual district assessment upon land is a lien against the property assessed from and after the first day in March of the year in which the assessment is levied.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1975, Ch. 911.)
-------------------------------------------

25926.

The collector within 20 days after receiving the assessment book from the secretary shall start the publication of a notice specifying all of the following:

(a) The assessments are due and payable.

(b) The times when these assessments will be delinquent.

(c) The penalties for delinquency.

(d) The time and place at which payment of assessments may be made.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 372.)
-------------------------------------------

25927.

The assessment notice shall be published at least once a week for two successive weeks in a newspaper published in the office county and in a newspaper published in each other affected county.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 372.)
-------------------------------------------

25928.

Failure to publish the assessment notice in any county other than the office county shall not affect any assessment on land in a county in which notice was published.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 372.)
-------------------------------------------

25929.

The collector shall attend at the time and place specified in the assessment notice to receive assessment payments.

The collector shall accept payment of current year assessments even though prior year delinquencies on the real property may exist. The acceptance of the payment shall not in any manner affect the validity of any proceeding or action previously taken pursuant to Chapter 5 (commencing with Section 26075) or Chapter 6 (commencing with Section 26225) of this part.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1982, Ch. 1137, Sec. 5.)
-------------------------------------------

25930.

Assessments or any other charge owed to the district shall be paid in lawful money of the United States. A reasonable additional charge may be made for processing or reprocessing an invalid check or other invalid instrument as provided in Section 25809.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1975, Ch. 264.)
-------------------------------------------

25931.

The collector shall mark the date of payment of any assessment in the assessment book opposite the name of the assessee.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 372.)
-------------------------------------------

25932.

The collector shall give to the person making the payment, one of the following:

(a) A receipt which specifies when applicable, (1) the amount of the assessment or charge, (2) the amount paid, and (3) the description of the property assessed.

(b) A statement or bill for the assessment or charge owed the district, with a stub or a copy of the bill which specifies when applicable (1) the amount of the assessment or charge, or if the assessment or charge is
 payable in more than one payment, the amount due with each payment; (2) a description of the property assessed; and (3) instructions that a receipt will be supplied only upon request since the stub or copy of the bill and the canceled check for payment constitute a receipt.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1975, Ch. 264.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Installments [25950. - 25953.]

25950.

The board may when it so desires and shall, when a written petition signed by a majority of the assessment payers in the district is filed requesting it, pass a resolution providing that thereafter annual assessments, including improvement district assessments or installments thereof but excepting completion assessments, shall be payable in two installments.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 372.)
-------------------------------------------

25951.

The two installments shall be equal unless the resolution specifies different percentages to be paid in each installment, in which case the installments shall be payable as specified in the resolution.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 372.)
-------------------------------------------

25952.

The resolution shall be adopted at or prior to the time of the levy of any annual assessment it is to affect.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 372.)
-------------------------------------------

25953.

The resolution may be rescinded or modified only so as to affect any assessment levied subsequent to the rescission or modification.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 372.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3. Segregation Before Delinquency [25975. - 25987.]

25975.

Any person claiming an interest in any parcel of land described on the current assessment book against which there are no delinquent assessments who desires to have the parcel segregated into two or more portions and separately valued and assessed on the current assessment book may file with the collector of the district an application so requesting, with descriptions sufficient for assessment purposes of each portion into which the applicant desires the parcel to be segregated, valued, and assessed.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 372.)
-------------------------------------------

25976.

The application may be filed at any time after the current assessment is due but not later than five days prior to the regular meeting of the board in December of the year in which the assessment was levied.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 372.)
-------------------------------------------

25977.

The application shall be signed, as evidence of their approval, by each of the persons assessed on the current assessment book with the parcel to be segregated.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 372.)
-------------------------------------------

25978.

Each application shall be accompanied by a fee of two dollars ($2) for each separate portion into which the applicant desires the parcel to be segregated.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1957, Ch. 995.)
-------------------------------------------

25979.

If the portions into which the applicant desires the land to be segregated have separate valuations shown on the current assessment book, the collector shall upon these valuations determine the amount of the current assessment due on each portion.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 372.)
-------------------------------------------

25980.

If the portions into which the applicant desires the land to be segregated do not have separate valuations shown on the current assessment book, the collector shall submit the descriptions of the portions to the assessor.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 372.)
-------------------------------------------

25981.

The assessor shall place a valuation on each described portion, and upon these valuations the collector shall determine the amount of the current assessment due on each portion as segregated.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 372.)
-------------------------------------------

25982.

In either case, upon estimating the assessments due on the segregated portions, the collector shall refer to the board the segregated descriptions, valuations, and estimated assessments due.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 372.)
-------------------------------------------

25983.

The board may either:

(a) Confirm, modify, or set aside the same.

(b) Refuse to authorize the segregation, separate valuation, and assessment.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 372.)
-------------------------------------------

25984.

The aggregate of the valuations of the segregated portions shall be the same as the valuation of the parcel before segregation.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 372.)
-------------------------------------------

25985.

The decision of the board shall be final, and the collector shall conform with it.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 372.)
-------------------------------------------

25986.

If the segregation and separate valuations and assessments are confirmed or modified, the board shall notify the collector, who shall cause the assessment book to be changed to show the segregation and separate valuations and assessments as confirmed or modified by the board, and he shall separately number the portions as segregated.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 372.)
-------------------------------------------

25987.

The assessment may thereafter be paid separately on any of the portions.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 372.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 4. Modification and Refund of Assessments [26000. - 26003.]

26000.

A board shall order the collector to cancel or modify, as may be proper, an assessment when it finds that any property has been either:

(a) Assessed in any year more than once.

(b) Assessed by reason of a clerical error for more than its full cash value. 

(c) Computed for assessment on an excessive acreage.

(d) Assessed while not in the district.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 372.)
-------------------------------------------

26001.

On order of the board any assessments, penalties or costs thereon, or portions thereof, shall be refunded by the treasurer if they were either:

(a) Paid more than once.

(b) Erroneously or illegally collected.

(c) Paid with respect to property not in the district and which has never been in the district.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1968, Ch. 780.)
-------------------------------------------

26002.

No order for a refund under this article shall be made except upon a claim both:

(a) Verified by the person who paid the assessments, penalties, or costs, his guardian, executor, or administrator.

(b) Filed within three years after the making of the payment sought to be refunded.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1968, Ch. 780.)
-------------------------------------------

26003.

The board may order the collector to cancel the uncollected assessment on any property which because of transfer to the State or another public agency is determined to be uncollectible.

(History: Added by Stats. 1957, Ch. 475.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 5. Delinquency [26075. - 26138.]



  ARTICLE 1. Date and Penalties for Delinquency [26075. - 26083.]

26075.

Unpaid assessments not payable in installments are delinquent at 5 p.m. on December 20th of the year in which they are levied.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1957, Ch. 995.)
-------------------------------------------

26076.

Whenever assessments are payable in installments the first installment if unpaid is delinquent at 5 p.m. on December 20th of the year in which the assessment was levied, and the second installment if unpaid is delinquent at 5 p.m. on the following June 20th. The whole amount of completion assessments if unpaid shall become delinquent on December 20th notwithstanding that assessments in the district are payable in installments. If any of the dates of delinquency in this section or in Section 26075 fall on a Saturday, Sunday or a state holiday, the assessment due on that date becomes delinquent at 5 p.m. on the next business day.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1957, Ch. 995.)
-------------------------------------------

26077.

The collector shall collect on delinquent assessments for the use of the district the following penalties:

(a) When assessments are not payable in installments, 5 per cent.

(b) When assessments are payable in installments:

(1) On the first installment, 10 per cent.

(2) On the second installment, 5 per cent.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 372.)
-------------------------------------------

26078.

Upon the assessment, if not payable in installments, or the second installment of it, if payable in installments, becoming delinquent, the collector shall collect, in addition to the assessments due on the delinquent list and the penalties added, costs in the sum of five dollars ($5) on each parcel of land separately assessed, and may collect costs of publication of the list of delinquencies and notice as required by Section 26105.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1985, Ch. 771, Sec. 8.)
-------------------------------------------

26079.
